Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
Beaver Control Program

§ 49-7-201.
Beaver and wild hog control program established; funding; county contributions; “participating landowner” defined.

There is established a beaver and wild hog control program which shall be developed by the Beaver and Wild Hog Control Advisory Board created in Section 49-7-203 and administered by the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce with the advice of the board or administered by a federal agency or agencies under an agreement with the board for that purpose. The program shall be limited to the control or eradication of beavers and wild hogs only on private lands or public lands, excluding federally owned lands but including lands whereupon easements are granted to a federal entity. The board may employ any personnel as is necessary to implement its duties to administer the program and set the salary of the personnel subject to State Personnel Board guidelines.

Any state, local or private funds available to the board to fund the program shall be used to match federal funds available for such purpose. The board may execute any agreements with any agency of the federal government as are necessary to obtain federal matching funds to finance the beaver and wild hog control program. State funds may be expended for wild hog control only by a specific line-item appropriation by the Legislature for that purpose.

Nonfederal funds to help finance the program may be obtained by the board from the following sources:

Appropriations by the Legislature; state funds may be expended for wild hog control only by a specific line-item appropriation by the Legislature for that purpose.

Contributions from participating counties;

Charges on participating landowners; and/or

Contributions from any other sources for such purpose.

Any county in the state desiring to participate in the program during its fiscal year shall contribute an amount established by the Beaver and Wild Hog Control Advisory Board for such purpose from any funds available in its general fund. The amount established by the advisory board shall be the minimum annual contribution required for a county to participate in the program. The minimum required contribution must be approved by three-fourths (3/4) of the advisory board members present and voting. In addition, a county may contribute an amount in excess of the minimum required contribution for administration of the beaver and wild hog control program in that county from any revenues available. The board shall establish the due date for the payment of contributions by counties.

The sum of county contributions may be matched by nonfederal funds available to the state for the beaver and wild hog control program.

Participating landowner means any person, corporation or association owning land in this state and taking part in the beaver and wild hog control program.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 402, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 75; Laws, 2002, ch. 428, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 514, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 440, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 49-7-203.
Beaver and Wild Hog Control Advisory Board created; composition of board; compensation of members; duties, responsibilities and authority of board.

There is created the Beaver and Wild Hog Control Advisory Board which shall be composed of the administrative heads of the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, State Forestry Commission, Department of Agriculture and Commerce, Mississippi Department of Transportation and Mississippi State Cooperative Extension Services, the Executive Director of the Mississippi Association of Supervisors, the Executive Vice President of Delta Council and the President of the Mississippi Farm Bureau Federation. In addition, the board shall include, as advisory, and nonvoting members:

The Chairmen of the House and Senate Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks Committees;

The Chairmen of the House and Senate Agriculture Committees; and

One (1) at-large member of the House and Senate appointed by the Lieutenant Governor and Speaker of the House.

The board shall elect a chairman from among its members, who shall preside over meetings.

The members of the board shall serve without compensation but all members of the board shall be entitled to reimbursement for all actual and necessary expenses incurred in the discharge of their duties, including mileage as authorized by law.

The board shall have the following duties and responsibilities:

To adopt rules and regulations governing times and places for meetings and governing the manner of conducting its business;

To develop a beaver and wild hog control program to be administered by the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce or by any agency or agencies under an agreement with the board for that purpose;

To designate the areas of the state having the greatest need for beaver and wild hog control or eradication and establish a list of priority areas on an annual basis;

To establish, assess and collect any fees charged to participating landowners; and

To function in an advisory capacity to the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce or any agency or agencies administering the beaver and wild hog control program.

The board shall have the authority to develop any programs and implement any regulations and policies. The board may develop what it deems necessary to address beaver and wild hog control within the state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 402, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 76; Laws, 2002, ch. 428, § 2; Laws, 2003, ch. 390, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 514, § 2; Laws, 2013, ch. 440, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2013.